District of Columbia statutes.
4-208.04

Amount of assistance payable.

The amount of assistance that the Mayor may pay to a TANF, POWER, or GAC recipient shall be the amount for which the individual or family is eligible, rounded down, when not a whole dollar amount, to the next lower whole dollar amount, except as provided in § 4-205.51.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 804, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-53, § 2(b), 30 DCR 6278
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(bbb), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-208.4.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(p), (x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(p), (x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(xx) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(p) and (x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(p) and (x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(p) and (x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(bbb) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(bbb) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(bbb) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(bbb) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).